Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 174 Transportation Cabinet

174.010.
Transportation Cabinet established — Secretary. [Repealed.]

174.012.
“Cabinet” defined.

As used in this chapter, “cabinet” means the Transportation Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 13, § 22, effective June 25, 2009.

174.015.
Departments within the cabinet. [Repealed.]

174.016.
Department of Rural and Municipal Aid — Duties — Personnel.

The Office of Rural and Secondary Roads within the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid shall be responsible for the development and implementation of the Rural Secondary Program and such other functions as are assigned by the secretary, except that the department shall not have jurisdiction over the County Road Aid Program or Municipal Road Aid Program unless an agreement initiated by a county or municipality is in effect.

The Department of Rural and Municipal Aid shall include an assistant state highway engineer for rural and municipal aid appointed pursuant to KRS Chapter 12 by the secretary upon the recommendation of the state highway engineer of the Department of Highways.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 350, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 85, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 98, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 13, § 4, effective June 25, 2009.

174.020.
Major organizational units.

The Transportation Cabinet shall consist of the following major organizational units:

The Office of the Secretary, which shall include, but not be limited to:

The secretary to be appointed by the Governor under KRS

12.255

; and

The deputy secretary appointed under KRS

12.040

;

The Department of Highways, headed by a commissioner, appointed by the Governor under KRS

12.040

;

The Department of Vehicle Regulation, headed by a commissioner, appointed by the Governor under KRS 12.040. The Motor Vehicle Commission established in KRS

190.058

shall be attached to the Department of Vehicle Regulation for administrative purposes;

The Department of Rural and Municipal Aid, headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor under KRS 12.040;

The Department of Aviation, headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor under KRS 12.040. The Kentucky Airport Zoning Commission established by KRS

183.861

shall be attached to the Department of Aviation;

The Office of Support Services, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040;

The Office of Transportation Delivery, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040;

The Office of Audits, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040;

The Office of Human Resource Management, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040;

The Office of Information Technology, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040;

The Office of Legal Services, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040;

The following offices, which shall be attached to the Office of the Secretary:

The Office of Public Affairs, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040;

The Office of Budget and Fiscal Management, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040;

The Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040;

The Office of Inspector General, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040; and

The Secretary’s Office of Safety, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040;

The following offices, which shall be attached to the Department of Highways:

The Office of Project Development, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040, who shall be a registered professional engineer under KRS Chapter 322, and who shall be known as the deputy state highway engineer for project development;

The Office of Project Delivery and Preservation, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040, who shall be a registered professional engineer under KRS Chapter 322, and who shall be known as the deputy state highway engineer for project delivery and preservation;

The Office of Highway Safety, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040; and

Highway District Offices One through Twelve, each district office to be headed by an executive director, also known as the chief district engineer, appointed under KRS 12.040, who shall be a registered professional engineer under KRS Chapter 322; and

The following offices, which shall be attached to the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid:

Office of Local Programs, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040; and

Office of Rural and Secondary Roads, headed by an executive director appointed under KRS 12.040.

The position of director in the Division of Environmental Analysis is a policy-making position under KRS

18A.175

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 3; 1976, ch. 299, § 34; 1982, ch. 184, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 339, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 406, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 216, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 215, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 333, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 85, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 417, § 2, effective December 1, 2000; 2001, ch. 16, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2003, ch. 7, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 98, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 45, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 13, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2021 ch. 186, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 218, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2009). During the processing of Senate Bill 182, which became 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 13, the following sentence was inadvertently inserted twice in subsection (1) of this statute: “The Motor Vehicle Commission established in KRS

190.058

shall be attached to the Department of Vehicle Regulation for administrative purposes.” This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected during codification by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(h).

(12/1/2000). The contingency on the effectiveness of this statute set by
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 417, sec. 18, was met, the voters of the Commonwealth having ratified at the general election on November 7, 2000, a constitutional amendment (see
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 399) abolishing the Railroad Commission.

174.025.
Office of Legal Services.

The executive director of the Office of Legal Services may also serve as general counsel if so appointed pursuant to KRS

12.210

. The Office of Legal Services shall be directly responsible to the secretary and shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the secretary. The office shall consist of such attorneys appointed pursuant to KRS

12.210

and such employees as necessary to perform the duties, responsibilities, and functions of the office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 4; 1982, ch. 184, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 406, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 85, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 98, § 4, effective June 20, 2005.

174.030.
Staff services — Administrator. [Repealed.]

174.035.
Internal organization — Divisions.

The secretary shall establish the internal organization of the cabinet not established in 1974 Acts, ch. 74, and shall divide the cabinet into such offices or divisions as the secretary may deem necessary to perform the functions, powers and duties of the cabinet, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 12.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 6.

174.040.
Powers of secretary — Designation of deputy secretaries.

The secretary shall have any and all necessary power and authority, subject to appropriate provisions of the statutes, to create such positions and to employ the necessary personnel in such positions to enable the secretary to perform the functions of the cabinet. The commissioner of the Department of Highways, the commissioner of the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid, and the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation may be designated as deputy secretaries for operational purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 7; 1984, ch. 350, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2005, ch. 98, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 13, § 5, effective June 25, 2009.

174.045.
Appointments of assistants.

All appointments to positions not in the classified service shall be made pursuant to KRS

12.050

and such appointees shall be major assistants to the secretary and shall assist in the development of policy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 8.

174.050.
Transfer of functions of Highways, Motor Transportation, and Aeronautics Departments.

There are hereby transferred to and vested in the secretary and cabinet all functions, powers and duties, funds, personnel, equipment, and supplies existing under present law in the Department of Highways, Department of Motor Transportation, Department of Aeronautics, and under commissioners and other officers and offices of said Departments of Highways, Motor Transportation, and Aeronautics.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 9.

174.055.
Other agency functions transferred to cabinet.

There are hereby transferred to and vested in the secretary and cabinet all functions, powers, duties, funds, personnel, equipment, and supplies relating to operators’ licenses under provisions of KRS Chapter 186, boats and boating provisions of KRS Chapter 235, financial responsibility provisions of KRS Chapter 189, traffic safety coordinating committee under provisions of KRS Chapter 17, and motor vehicle inspection under provisions of KRS Chapter 189, which said provisions of law have been conferred upon the Department of Public Safety and under the commissioner and other officers and offices of said Department of Public Safety. The examination of applicants under KRS

186.480

shall be retained by the Department of Kentucky State Police.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 10; 2007, ch. 85, § 179, effective June 26, 2007.

174.056.
KYTC photo license account. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

The KYTC photo license account is created within the road fund, to be administered by the Transportation Cabinet. The account shall consist of the portion of fees directed to the account under KRS

186.531

and any other proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for the purposes of the account.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys remaining in the account not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the account shall become a part of the account and shall not lapse.

Moneys in the account shall be used for the purposes of verifying, creating, and distributing secure photo instruction permits, operator’s licenses, and personal identification cards and are hereby appropriated for these purposes.

History.

2017 ch. 100, § 23, effective January 1, 2019.

174.056.
KYTC photo license account. [Effective July 1, 2024]

The KYTC photo license account is created within the road fund, to be administered by the Transportation Cabinet. The account shall consist of the portion of fees directed to the account under KRS

186.531

and

186.577

, and any other proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for the purposes of the account.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys remaining in the account not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the account shall become a part of the account and shall not lapse.

Moneys in the account shall be used for the purposes of verifying, creating, and distributing secure photo instruction permits, operator’s licenses, and personal identification cards and are hereby appropriated for these purposes.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 23, effective January 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 126, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

174.057.
Railroad regulation — Division of Planning — Administrative regulations.

The Transportation Cabinet shall have the responsibility of regulating railroads within the Commonwealth. The cabinet shall delegate to the Division of Planning within the Department of Highways’ Office of Project Development the powers necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The secretary may employ such personnel as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities associated with the regulation of railroads. The division shall have all the powers previously vested in the Kentucky Railroad Commission. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 417, § 1, effective December 1, 2000; 2009, ch. 13, § 6, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(12/1/2000). The contingency on the effectiveness of this statute set by
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 417, sec. 18, was met, the voters of the Commonwealth having ratified at the general election on November 7, 2000, a constitutional amendment (see
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 399) abolishing the Railroad Commission.

174.058.
Shortline railroad assistance fund.

As used in this section:

“Class II railroad” means a railroad company classified as a Class II carrier by the federal Surface Transportation Board; and

“Class III railroad” means a railroad company classified as a Class III carrier by the federal Surface Transportation Board.

The shortline railroad assistance fund is hereby established in the State Treasury as an interest-bearing fund and shall be administered by the cabinet.

The fund shall be a dedicated fund, and all moneys in the fund shall be used solely to provide financial assistance for the rehabilitation and improvement of a Class II railroad and Class III railroad operating in Kentucky.

Eligible costs for which financial assistance may be provided shall include construction, reconstruction, improvement, or rehabilitation of rail facilities, including tracks, ties, roadbeds, and related structures used for freight rail operation.

Financial assistance provided from the fund shall be limited to:

Grants; and

Loans, which shall be made at or below market interest rates, including interest-free loans, at terms not to exceed ten (10) years.

All loan payments and repayments, and all interest payments on loans, shall be credited to the fund.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations regarding procedures for providing financial assistance pursuant to this section.

The shortline railroad assistance fund is authorized to receive funds from appropriations of the General Assembly, repayments of loans and interest thereon, interest from fund principal, grants, donations, and payments to the fund for any lawful purpose.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section.

The cabinet may enter into agreements with federal or state agencies or any other persons to carry out the provisions of this section.

Any moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 72, effective June 26, 2009.

174.060.
Licenses and fees.

There are hereby transferred to and vested in the secretary and cabinet all functions, powers, duties, funds, personnel, equipment and supplies relating to motor vehicle license under the provisions of KRS Chapter 186, operator license under provisions of KRS Chapter 186 and boating fees under provisions of KRS Chapter 235, which said provisions of law have been conferred upon the Department of Revenue and under the commissioner and other officers and offices of said Department of Revenue.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 11.

174.065.
Traffic safety.

The cabinet shall:

Assist the Department of Kentucky State Police in coordinating all efforts of the state’s various departments and agencies to promote traffic safety and in making recommendations regarding the prevention of unnecessary duplications of these efforts;

Cooperate with all organizations, public or private, in the encouragement and promotion of traffic safety education in all forms; and

Receive, control, and expend, in accordance with the general provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes governing financial administration of all state agencies, grants, and funds from either public or private sources.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 12; 1984, ch. 404, § 18, effective July 13, 1984; 2007, ch. 85, § 180, effective June 26, 2007.

174.070.
Funds, credits, assets, etc., transferred to cabinet.

All funds, credits, assets, appropriations, outstanding obligations, personnel, equipment, any and all resources or other tangible personal property and any business or other matter undertaken or now vested in the Department of Highways, Department of Motor Transportation, Department of Aeronautics, Department of Public Safety, Department of Revenue, relating to functions transferred under 1974 Acts ch. 74, are hereby transferred and vested in the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 13.

174.075.
Rules and regulations.

Except as otherwise provided in 1974 Acts ch. 74, all rules, regulations, acts, agreements, determinations and decisions of the Department of Public Safety, Department of Highways, Department of Motor Transportation, Department of Aeronautics, and Department of Revenue, shall remain in effect within the cabinet until duly modified or repealed by the secretary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 14.

174.080.
Administrative regulations.

The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of 1974 Acts ch. 74.

The Transportation Cabinet shall adopt such administrative regulations and procedures consistent with the provisions of KRS

56.610

to

56.760

as it deems necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of KRS

56.610

to

56.760

with regard to requirements of the Department of Highways as provided for in KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177 and 180.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 15; 1986, ch. 15, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

174.085.
Administrative support services.

All corporate bodies and instrumentalities of the Commonwealth, advisory committees, commissions, councils, interstate compact, or other statutory bodies presently attached to the functions in whole or in part of the Departments of Public Safety, Aeronautics, Highways, Motor Transportation, and Revenue and transferred to the Department of Transportation under 1974 Acts ch. 74, shall be attached to the Transportation Cabinet for administrative support services. The secretary of transportation, or his designee, shall serve as member of any authority, commission, board, committee, or other entity on which by virtue of law, regulation, or order the commissioner of public safety, commissioner of highways, commissioner of motor transportation, commissioner of aeronautics, commissioner of revenue is a member by virtue of his office. Any office, or its successor agency, presently designated as Kentucky representative for a federally related program shall continue as such until such designation is modified by the secretary with the approval of the Governor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 16.

174.100.
Public hearing required prior to expenditure by unit of local government of state-derived tax revenues on roads — Effect of hearing — Exceptions.

Before any unit of local government expends state-derived tax revenues on a state rural, secondary, county road or municipal highway, road, street, or county or municipal bridge, it shall provide an opportunity to the public to provide input in a public meeting for which notice has been given under KRS 61.823(2) to (4) with regard to the project and to priorities for use of tax moneys for road and bridge purposes.

Prior to the contemplated date of expenditure of state-derived tax revenues on a road or bridge by a unit of local government, that unit of government shall include the topic as a specific item on the public meeting agenda and shall allow any person to speak with regard to any proposed project, any project which he or she feels should be built or done which has not been proposed, priorities for completion of projects, and any other matter related to road or bridge projects.

The unit of local government shall not be bound by the comments and input provided at the meeting but shall give due consideration to them.

No unit of local government shall begin construction on a road or bridge project in which state-derived tax revenues are involved until the meeting as provided in this section has been held.

This section shall not be construed to require a separate meeting for each project. A single meeting encompassing the entire road and bridge program, if all projects subsequently undertaken have been identified at the meeting, shall meet the requirements of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to emergency repair or replacement of roads or bridges necessitated by natural or man-caused disasters nor to street cleaning or snow removal operations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 370, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 50, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 33, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 2022 ch. 103, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has corrected the format of this section following the enactment of 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 103, sec. 3. The words in the text were not changed.

174.105.
Motor carrier regulatory board — Membership — Hearings on violations. [Repealed.]

174.120.
Statewide bicycle and bikeways program.

The Transportation Cabinet shall develop and coordinate a statewide bicycle and bikeways program and shall coordinate plans for promotion of bicycling and promotion of bikeways with other state agencies, and units of local government in order to maximize the use of roads, streets, parks and other publicly owned lands, abandoned road beds, and other resources in the development of bikeways.

The cabinet shall:

Assist and cooperate with local governments and other agencies in the development and construction of local and regional bikeway projects;

Develop and publish policies, procedures, and standards for planning, designing, and constructing, maintaining, marking, and operating bikeways in the state, and for the safety of bicyclists, motorists, and the public;

Develop bikeway demonstration projects and safety training programs; and

Develop and construct a State Bikeway System.

The cabinet shall be authorized to appropriate needed funds for the program in the biennial budget, subject to approval of the General Assembly.

The cabinet is authorized to obtain any federal, state, local, or private funds available to the cabinet, and designated for the purpose of this section and KRS

174.125

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 111, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

174.125.
Kentucky Bicycle and Bikeway Commission — Membership — Duties — Authority to adopt administrative regulations.

There is hereby created a Kentucky Bicycle and Bikeway Commission within the Transportation Cabinet. The commission shall consist of seven (7) members appointed by the Governor. Members of the commission shall receive necessary travel expenses. The members of the commission shall elect a chairman who shall serve a two (2) year term. Initially, three (3) members shall be appointed for two (2) years, and four (4) members for four (4) years. Each appointment thereafter shall be for four (4) years. Upon the resignation of a member in midterm, the Governor shall appoint a replacement for the remainder of the unexpired term. The Governor shall make appointments to the commission with a view to represent each of the state’s geographical regions and to various types of bicycle users and interests.

The commission shall meet in various sections of the state on a quarterly basis, and at other times as may be necessary to fulfill its duties. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The commission shall be provided with adequate staff as determined by the secretary, and this staff shall be responsible for maintaining the minutes of the meetings, researching bicycle and bikeway related topics, and other activities for the commission as may be consistent with the commission’s role within the cabinet.

The commission shall have the following duties:

To represent the interests of bicyclists in advising the secretary on all matters pertaining to bicycles, bikeways, and their use, extent, and location;

Assist the bicycle and bikeway program in the exercise of its duties within the cabinet;

Promote the best interests of the bicycling public, within the context of the total transportation system, to governing officials and the public at large.

The secretary shall study bicycle and bikeway needs and potentials and shall report the findings to the legislature on an annual basis.

The secretary shall adopt administrative regulations to implement the purposes of KRS

174.120

and this section.

Initial appointments to the commission shall be made no later than August 1, 1994.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 111, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

174.130.
Cabinet’s duty to transmit information concerning abandonment of railroad corridors to Department of Parks and Railtrail Development Office — Records and maps of railroad lines.

The Transportation Cabinet, including any agency or other unit of government attached to the cabinet, shall immediately transmit to the Department of Parks and to the Commonwealth’s Railtrail Development Office in the Department for Local Government any information received from a railroad or other person having an ownership interest in a railroad corridor pertaining to a proposed or pending action or proceeding to obtain federal authority for the regulatory abandonment of that railroad corridor.

The Transportation Cabinet shall keep a record of railroad lines in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, including both lines that have been abandoned through the federal government’s regulatory abandonment process and those where any railroad property interest in the railroad corridor itself has been abandoned under Kentucky law. The cabinet shall annually publish an updated map showing the location and as much information as to the status of these lines as practicable. The record shall include, inasmuch as possible:

A description of the line and its location;

The current or last railroad owner of the line;

The operator of the line;

The addresses and phone numbers for the owners and operators of the lines;

Whether the owner of the line has received authority from the Federal Government to discontinue service over the line;

Whether the owner of the line has received authority from the Federal Government to abandon the line;

Whether the owner of the line has consummated any authority granted by the Federal Government to discontinue service over the line or to abandon the line;

Whether the line has been railbanked under either federal or state law; and

Any other information the cabinet deems pertinent and useful to the public.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 338, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 47, § 81, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 77, effective July 15, 2010.

174.135.
Division of Incident Management.

The director of the Division of Incident Management within the Department of Highways’ Office of Highway Safety shall be responsible for statewide transportation emergency and critical incident information and systems control. The director:

Shall be directly responsible and report to the executive director of the Office of Highway Safety; and

May, with the approval of the executive director, employ the staff necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the division.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 7, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2009, ch. 13, § 7, effective June 25, 2009.